Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.126

Collector vehicle.

"Collector vehicle" means any motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least thirty years old.

[ 2015 c 200 s 4; 2009 c 142 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 200: See note following RCW 46.16A.428.